In the U.S., probably the largest and most successful campaign to discredit U.S. intelligence agencies came in the aftermath of the Watergate scandal. We should learn as much as we can from history, so a lot of the rest of this letter is on this topic.

In May 1973, Seymour Hersh revealed that the CIA had provided "material and research" assistance to the burglars who initiated the Watergate scandal:


http://www.nytimes.com/1973/05/07/archives/cushman-named-sources-say-general-acted-upon-request-by-ehrlichman.html
	CUSHMAN NAMED

	By SEYMOUR M. HERSH MAY 7, 1973 

	WASHINGTON, May 6—Gen, Robert E. Cushman Jr., the Marine Corps commandant who in 1971 was Deputy Director of Central Intelligence, authorized the use of Central Intelligence Agency material and research in the burglary of the office of Dr. Daniel Ellsberg's former psychiatrist, sources close to the Watergate case said today.

	...The New York Times reported today that Federal prosecutors in the Watergate case had summoned some officials of the C.I.A. to discuss that agency's role in the burglary. General Cushman apparently was among the first to be questioned on the agency's activity.

	...In his Senate confirmation hearings in February for the post in Iran, Mr. Helms declared that his agency had nothing to do with the bugging and wiretapping of the Democratic National Committee headquarters at the Watergate complex. He said he had “no control” over agency employes who had left. At least four members of the original Watergate break‐in team have said privately that they thought they were participating in a C.I.A. operation at two years, had ordered Dr. Melloy to cooperate with the White House. One source with close connections to the agency described many senior agency official as being “angry and depressed” over the new disclosures. “They feel that irreparable damage has been done by this to the C.I.A.,” the source said of the senior officials. “They think the whole project was an absolute violation of the C.I.A.'s charter.”

	The legality of the agency's, cooperation with Hunt and Liddy is questionable. The National Security Act of 1947, which set up the agency, expressly bars it from having any “police, subpoena, law‐enforcement powers or internal security functions.” 


Although later investigations revealed that Hersh kept key details from his story and misrepresented others:


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000497356.pdf
	c. The Washington Post, 8 May 1973, Page 1: "Rep. Lucien N. Nedzi (D., Mich.), chairman of an Armed Services subcommittee on the CIA, disclosed that the agency's director, James R. Schlesinger, confirmed to him yesterday that Marine Corps Commandant Robert E. Cushman Jr. authorized use of CIA equipment in the Ellsberg burglary case."

	...In the interest of factual accuracy regarding this important matter, and in fairness to General Cushman personally, I wish to point out that this Committee's investigation to date has produced no evidence whatsoever that either General Cushman or any other CIA official, had any knowledge or suspicion that the equipment and assistance requested on behalf of Mr. Hunt was for use in burglarizing the offices of Dr Ellsberg's psychiatrist, or for any other illegal purpose. On the contrary, CIA had no detailed knowledge of Mr. Hunt's activities but CIA officials apparently were under the impression that Mr. Hunt was engaged in investigating security leaks that were a major concern of the Government at that particular time. When Mr. Hunt's continued requests for assistance aroused the suspicions of Agency officers that he might be engaged in some improper or illegal activity, or activity beyond the Agency's authority or charter, it appears that General Cushman immediately terminated relations with Mr. Hunt and thereafter the Agency refused his requests for further assistance.


And it looks a lot like Hersh is a Russian propagandist (although I don't know if Hersh was as brazen back then):


https://www.rt.com/usa/375212-hersh-russian-hacking-propaganda/
	 Investigative journalist Seymour Hersh called the way US media have reported on the allegations that Russia somehow interfered in the 2016 US elections “outrageous.” The Pulitzer Prize-winning reporter said the “hectoring” press overlooked the real story.

	“The way they behaved on the Russia stuff was outrageous,” Hersh told The Intercept in an interview for Jeremy Scahill’s inaugural podcast. “They were hectoring. They didn’t do reporting.”


https://theintercept.com/2017/01/25/seymour-hersh-blasts-media-for-uncritically-promoting-russian-hacking-story/
	...According to the report, the NSA was said to have had a lower confidence level than James Clapper and the CIA about the conclusion that Russia intended to influence the election. Hersh characterized the report as full of assertions and thin on evidence.

	“It’s high camp stuff,” Hersh told The Intercept. “What does an assessment mean? It’s not a national intelligence estimate. If you had a real estimate, you would have five or six dissents. One time they said 17 agencies all agreed. Oh really? The Coast Guard and the Air Force — they all agreed on it? And it was outrageous and nobody did that story. An assessment is simply an opinion. If they had a fact, they’d give it to you. An assessment is just that. It’s a belief. And they’ve done it many times.”

	...In recent years, Hersh has been attacked for his investigative reports on a variety of policies and actions authorized by the Obama administration, but he has never backed down from his aggressive approach to journalism. His reporting on the raid that killed Osama bin Laden dramatically contradicted the administration’s story, and his investigation on the use of chemical weapons in Syria cast doubts on the official claim that Bashar al Assad ordered the attacks. 


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-05-01/seymour-hersh-says-hillary-approved-sending-libyas-sarin-syrian-rebels
	Hersh also said that a secret agreement in 2012 was reached between the Obama Administration and the leaders of Turkey, Saudi Arabia, and Qatar, to set up a sarin gas attack and blame it on Assad so that the US could invade and overthrow Assad.


https://www.lrb.co.uk/v38/n01/seymour-m-hersh/military-to-military
	Seymour M. Hersh on US intelligence sharing in the Syrian war

	When it comes to tackling Islamic State, Russia and the US have much to offer each other. Many in the IS leadership and rank and file fought for more than a decade against Russia in the two Chechen wars that began in 1994, and the Putin government is heavily invested in combating Islamist terrorism.

	...A former White House adviser on Russian affairs told me that before 9/11 Putin ‘used to say to us: “We have the same nightmares about different places.” He was referring to his problems with the caliphate in Chechnya and our early issues with al-Qaida. These days, after the Metrojet bombing over Sinai and the massacres in Paris and elsewhere, it’s hard to avoid the conclusion that we actually have the same nightmares about the same places.’

	Yet the Obama administration continues to condemn Russia for its support of Assad. 

	...Putin’s bombing campaign provoked a series of anti-Russia articles in the American press. On 25 October, the New York Times reported, citing Obama administration officials, that Russian submarines and spy ships were ‘aggressively’ operating near the undersea cables that carry much of the world’s internet traffic – although, as the article went on to acknowledge, there was ‘no evidence yet’ of any Russian attempt actually to interfere with that traffic.

	...Economic sanctions, meanwhile, are still in effect against Russia for what a large number of Americans consider Putin’s war crimes in Ukraine


http://www.nytimes.com/2013/08/31/world/middleeast/syria.html
	U.S. Releases Detailed Intelligence on Syrian Chemical Attack

	By DAVID JOLLY, SCOTT SAYARE and RICK GLADSTONEAUG. 30, 2013 

	PARIS — Seeking to move beyond Britain’s blindsiding rejection of military intervention in the Syrian conflict, the Obama administration received strong support from France on Friday and released a detailed intelligence summary to buttress its contention that the Syrian government used chemical munitions in an Aug. 21 attack, asserting for the first time that it had killed 1,429 people, nearly a third of them children.


https://www.lrb.co.uk/v36/n08/seymour-m-hersh/the-red-line-and-the-rat-line
	The Red Line and the Rat Line

	Seymour M. Hersh on Obama, Erdoğan and the Syrian rebels

	By the last days of August the president had given the Joint Chiefs a fixed deadline for the launch. ‘H hour was to begin no later than Monday morning [2 September], a massive assault to neutralise Assad,’ the former intelligence official said. So it was a surprise to many when during a speech in the White House Rose Garden on 31 August Obama said that the attack would be put on hold, and he would turn to Congress and put it to a vote.

	At this stage, Obama’s premise – that only the Syrian army was capable of deploying sarin – was unravelling. Within a few days of the 21 August attack, the former intelligence official told me, Russian military intelligence operatives had recovered samples of the chemical agent from Ghouta. They analysed it and passed it on to British military intelligence; this was the material sent to Porton Down. (A spokesperson for Porton Down said: ‘Many of the samples analysed in the UK tested positive for the nerve agent sarin.’ MI6 said that it doesn’t comment on intelligence matters.)

	The former intelligence official said the Russian who delivered the sample to the UK was ‘a good source – someone with access, knowledge and a record of being trustworthy’. 


https://scotthorton.org/interviews/040714-seymour-hersh/
	Scott Horton: … I think, well, it’s all over Twitter, anyway, that like, well yeah, you know, right, it’s a Russian sample so how can you believe it? But it seems to me from your reporting here that the UK and the US Governments didn’t have a problem with the Russian origin of the sample.

	Seymour Hersh: Oh my God, don’t forget, we and the Russians were pretty good allies in the 1990s. And when the chemical warfare treaty went into effect in 1997, we pooled information with the Russians. And I can also tell you, I write about this in my article, it certainly did come from a Russian. It was delivered by a Russian source who was described to me by an American as somebody really solid. Somebody we all knew, somebody we all trusted. This is not a game. We also had our own information about what was going on inside the Syrian arsenal. Believe me, the Syrian government would be more than happy to give a sample of any of it because they were eager to have this looked at. So that’s just, you know, only in America, it’s so funny, Scott, only in America, would you read that “Oh my God, Russia!” (laughs) The Cold War is still on. It can be very strange. Yes, the Russians supplied the sample. They picked up a sample right away, a lot of samples. The British had absolutely no trouble with the provenance. They knew it came from Damascus, the British analyzed it. It was the British finding out of Porton Down that convinced our army that we had to tell the President he doesn’t have a case. And I think, that if you want a run on with the Russians, go ahead.


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...zerohedge.com ... russia-insider.com...


http://russia-insider.com/en/behind-medias-assault-seymour-hersh/ri7297
	Ultimately, the bipartisan attack on Hersh shows the complete media conformity on US foreign policy, where Republicans, Democrats, and even “progressive” media have come to accept a governmental policy of never-ending war and mass surveillance. No questions asked.


Still, Director of Central Intelligence James Schlesinger and his deputy director of operations, William Colby, took the report very seriously--so seriously, in fact, that in a flash of zeal hot enough to "fire everyone if necessary," the CIA's leadership compiled a list of everything questionable or embarrassing the CIA had ever done:


http://spartacus-educational.com/JFKschlesingerJ.htm
	William Colby, Honorable Men: My Life in the CIA (1978)

	...But it was on my trip to Bangkok in early May of 1973 that I read in a newspaper the story that would radically shake up my life, and that of CIA. It was the story that reported that, during Daniel Ellsberg's trial for disclosing the Pentagon Papers, it had been revealed that the office of his psychiatrist, Dr. Lewis J. Fielding, had been broken into by Howard Hunt, using CIA equipment, in search of material that would then be turned over to CIA and from which CIA would prepare a"psychiatric profile" on Ellsberg for the White House. This was a shocker and I couldn't understand how I had never heard of it before, when I was supposed to have been in charge of assembling all the CIA material relevant to Watergate. But more disturbingly, I wondered how the news had hit Schlesinger; for I had assured him that I had told him the full story of CIA's relationship to Watergate on virtually the first day he had arrived at Langley.

	I didn't have to wait long after my return home to find Schlesinger's reaction. In a most moving vote of confidence in me, Schlesinger said he assumed that the news was as much of a surprise to me as it was to him. But then he went on to say that we would tear the place apart and "fire everyone if necessary," but we had to find out whether there were any other such questionable or illegal activities hidden in the secret recesses of the clandestine past that we didn't know about and that might explode at any time under our feet. To do this, Schlesinger said, he wanted to issue a directive to all CIA past and present employees, ordering them to come forward with any matter they knew of where the Agency had engaged in an activity outside its proper charter. With that directive, which he issued on May 9, the CIA "family jewels" were born, and led inexorably to a year of Congressional investigations and a whole new status for American intelligence.


Inevitably, the CIA's "family jewels" made its way to the press:


https://books.google.com/books?id=oM8u2198DcsC&pg=PT144
	When Schlesinger found out about the agency's ties to Watergate, he was enraged and threatened to "fire everyone if necessary." Schlesinger didn't want any more unseen land mines detonating under his feet. William Colby, Schlesinger's deputy director for operations, proposed that the DCI issue an agency-wide order directing anyone who had information about anything the CIA may have done outside its charter to come forth with the information. The order was distributed on May 9; in it, Colby instructed all agency employees with damming information to "call my secretary (extension 6363.)" That same day, Nixon appointed Schlesinger secretary of defense. Colby became DCI. Extension 6363 started ringing off the hook.

	Colby proceeded to do what spies are never, ever supposed to do. He made a list of secrets, taking the most sordid details of the agency's improprieties--facts that had been compartmented, made "need to know," "eyes only," and operations so black that there wasn't a paper trail at all--and put them all in one place. In the charged political atmosphere of the Watergate era, listing secrets was like stockpiling dynamite in a match factory.

	As the calls rolled in, Colby's list grew to 693 singled-spaced pages. CIA officers gave the sensitive file a nickname: the "Family Jewels." The dossier teemed with everything from the merely immoral to the downright inhuman, from petter improprieties to out-and-out felonies. The CIA had bugged and burgled Americans in their homes, put dissidents under illegal surveillance, and experimented on unwitting people with dangerous drugs. The NSA tapped countless Americans' phones. And then there were the assassination attempts: Lumumba in the Congo, Castro in Cuba, Trujilo in the Dominican Republic--incidents that the CIA was either directly involved with or far too close to. The stockpile of combustible secrets grew. On December 22, 1974, someone lit a match.

	HUGE CIA OPERATION REPORTED IN U.S. AGAINST ANTIWAR FORCES, OTHER DISSIDENTS IN NIXON YEARS, read the headline of the New York Times.


The CIA had been conducting illegal surveillance of U.S. persons suspected of working for the Soviets, including infiltrating activist organizations and opening mail between the U.S. and Soviet Union (
http://www.aarclibrary.org/publib/church/reports/vol2/html/ChurchV2_0029b.htm). But Hersh wasn't satisfied with calling out the CIA's program for being illegal--he tried to make its raison d'etre of Soviet infiltration look like a crazy excuse:


http://www.nytimes.com/1974/12/22/archives/huge-cia-operation-reported-in-u-s-against-antiwar-forces-other.html
	HUGE C.I.A. OPERATION REPORTED IN U.S. AGAINST ANTIWAR FORCES, OTHER DISSIDENTS IN NIXON YEARS

	By SEYMOUR M. HERSH DEC. 22, 1974 

	WASHINGTON, Dec. 21—The Central Intelligence Agency, directly violating its charter, conducted a massive, illegal domestic intelligence operation during the Nixon Administration against the antiwar movement and other dissident groups in the United States, according to well‐placed Government sources.

	An extensive investigation by The New York Times has established that intelligence files on at least 10,000 American citizens were maintained by a special unit of the C.I.A. that was reporting directly to Richard Helms, then the Director of Central Intelligence and now the Ambassador to Iran.

	In addition, the sources said, a check of the C.I.A.'s domestic files ordered last year by Mr. Helms's successor, James R. Schlesinger, produced evidence of dozens of other illegal activities by members of the C.I.A. inside the United States, beginning in the nineteen‐fifties, including break‐ins, wiretapping and the surreptitious inspection of mail.

	...Some sources also reported that there was widespread paper shredding at the agency shortly after Mr. Schlesinger began to crack down on the C.I.A.'s operations.

	Asked about that, however, Government officials said that they could “guarantee” that the domestic intelligence files were still intact.

	“There's certainly been no order to destroy them,” one official said:

	When confronted with the Times's Information about the C.I.A.'s domestic operations earlier this week, high‐ranking American intelligence officials confirmed its basic accuracy, but cautioned against drawing “unwarranted conclusions.”

	Espionage Feared

	Those officials, who insisted on not being quoted by name, contended that all of the C.I.A.'s domestic activities against American citizens were initiated in the belief that foreign governments and foreign espionage may have been involved.

	“Anything that we did was in the context of foreign counterintelligence and it was focused at foreign intelligence and foreign intelligence problems,” one official said.

	The official also said that the requirement to maintain files on American citizens emanated, in part, from the so‐called Huston plan. That plan, named for its author, Tom Charles Huston, a Presidential aide, was a White House project in 1970 calling for the use of such, illegal activities as burglaries and wiretapping to combat antiwar activities, and student turmoil that the White House believed was being “fomented” —as the Huston plan stated—by black extremists.

	...Professor Ransom said that his research of the Congressional debate at, the time the C.I.A. was set up makes clear that Congress expressed concern over any police state tactics and intended to avoid the possibility. Professor Ransom quoted one member as having Said during floor debate, “We don't want a Gestapo.”

	Beyond his briefings for Senator John C. Stennis, Democrat of Mississippi, and Representative Lucien N. Nedzi, Democrat of Michigan, the respective chairmen of the Senate and House Intelligence subcommittees of the Armed Services Committees, Mr. Colby apparently had not informed other Ford Administration officials as of yesterday of the C.I.A. problems.

	“Counterintelligence!” one high‐level Justice Department official exclaimed upon being given some details of the C.I.A.'s alleged domestic operations. “They're not supposed to have any counterintelligence in this country.”

	“Oh, my God,” he said, “oh my God.”

	...The Times's sources, who included men with access to first‐hand knowledge of the C.I.A.'s alleged domestic activities, took, sharp exception to the official suggestion that such activities were the result of legitimate counterintelligence needs.

	“Look, that's how it started,” one man said. “They were looking for evidence of foreign involvement in the antiwar movement. But that's not how it ended up. This just grew and mushroomed internally.”

	“Maybe they began with a Check on Fonda,” the source said, speaking hypothetically. “But then they began to check on her friends. They'd see her at an antiwar rally and take photographs. I think this was going on even before the Huston plan.

	‘Highly Coordinated’

	“This wasn't a series of isolated events. It was highly coordinated. People were targeted, information was collected on them, and it was all put on [computer] tape, just like the agency does with information about K.G.B. [Soviet] agents.

	...The official suggested that what he called the “Nixon antiwar hysteria” may hive been a major factor in the C.I.A.'s decision to begin maintaining domestic files on American citizens.

	...These junior officials are known to believe that the alleged domestic spying on antiwar activists originated as an ostensibly legitimate counterintelligence operation to determine whether the antiwar movement had been penetrated by foreign agents.

	In 1969 and 1970, the C.I.A. was asked by the White House to determine whether foreign governments were supplying undercover agents and funds to antiwar radicals and Black Panther groups in the United States. Those studies, conducted by C.I.A. officials who reportedly did not know of the alleged secret domestic intelligence activities, concluded that there was no evidence of foreign support.

	...He was repeatedly described by former C.I.A. officials as an unrelenting cold warrior who was convinced that the Soviet Union was playing a major role in the antiwar activities.

	One former high‐level C.I.A. official accused Mr. Angleton of a “spook mentality” who saw conspiracies everywhere. The official said that Mr. Angleton was convinced that many members of the press had ties to the Soviet Union and was suspicious of anyone who wrote anything friendly about the Soviet Union.

	...A Source In Moscow

	“The intelligence was not acquired in the United States,” Mr. Angleton declared, “it came from Moscow. Our source there is still active and still productive; the opposition. still doesn't know.”

	Mr. Angleton then described how the C.I.A. had obtained information from Communist sources about the alleged demolition training of black militants by the North Koreans. He also told of recent intelligence efforts involving the K.G.B. and Yasir Arafat, chairman of the Palestine Liberation Organization.

	A number of former important F.B.I. domestic intelligence sources took issue with Mr. Angelton's apparent suggestion that the domestic antiwar activity was linked to the Soviet Union.

	“There was a lot of stuff [on radicals in the United States] that came in from the C.I.A. overseas,” one former official recalled, but he said a lot of it was worthless.


	Amazement and Dismay

	Other officials closely involved with United States intelligence expressed amazement and dismay that the head of counterintelligence would make such random suggestions during a telephone conversation with a newsman.

	“You know,” said one member of Congress who is involved with the monitoring of C.I.A. activities, “that's even a better story than the domestic spying.”

	One former C.I.A. official who participated in the 1969 and 1970 White House‐directed studies of alleged foreign involvement in the antiwar movement said that Mr. Angleton “undoubtedly believes that foreign agents were behind the student movement, but he doesn't know what he's talking about.”


The way Hersh reported it, countering Soviet espionage was an excuse by the CIA to enact some kind of gestapo-style crackdown on antiwar activists and black nationalist dissidents. Counterintelligence chief James Angleton did an awful job of explaining what the Soviets were doing, and Hersh held him up for ridicule, even though what Angleton told him turned out to be true:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Terrorism_and_the_Soviet_Union#Support_for_terrorist_organizations
	The leader of the PLO, Yasser Arafat, established close collaboration with the Romanian Securitate service and the Soviet KGB in the beginning of the 1970s.[9] The secret training of PLO guerrillas was provided by the KGB.[10] However, the main KGB activities and arms shipments were channeled through Wadie Haddad of the DFLP organization, who usually stayed in a KGB dacha (BARVIKHA-1) during his visits to the Soviet Union. Led by Carlos the Jackal, a group of PFLP fighters accomplished a spectacular raid on the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries office in Vienna in 1975. Advance notice of this operation "was almost certainly" given to the KGB.[9]


https://books.google.com/books?id=5D00J6dykWQC&pg=PA80
	...Algeria never permitted the Party to set up a military training base as Cleaver had hoped.

	In July 1970, Elridge Cleaver, Kathleen Cleaver, and Elaine Brown, representing the Panthers, along with individuals from "the antiwar movement, the radical media the women's liberation movement, the Asian revolutionary group, and the Red Guard" would visit North Korea as well as North Vietnam and China.


http://apjjf.org/2015/13/12/Benjamin-Young/4303.html
	Juche in the United States: The Black Panther Party’s Relations with North Korea, 1969-1971

	In 1969, the Black Panther Party (BPP) established a relationship with the North Korean leadership that was based upon the principle of self-reliance (under the rubric of the Juche ideology), the transnational goal of Third World revolution, and a mutual antagonism toward American intervention around the world. Although the U.S. government forbade its citizens from travelling to North Korea, BPP leader Eldridge Cleaver along with other Panthers bypassed travel restrictions and visited North Korea to join anti-imperialist journalist conferences in 1969 and 1970. In North Korea, officially known as the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK), the Panthers found a new ideology and a government that was critical of the U.S. government. The Panthers established an alliance with North Korean leaders who they recognized as an independent force within the world communist movement.


https://books.google.com/books/about/The_Sword_and_the_Shield.html?id=9TWUAQ7Xof8C
	Having given up hope of influencing King, the Centre aimed instead at replacing him with a more radical and malleable leader. In August 1967 the Centre approved an operational plan by the deputy head of Service A, Yuri Modin, former controller of the Magnificent Five, to discredit King and his chief lieutenants by placing articles in the African press, which could then be reprinted in American newspapers,portraying King as an “Uncle Tom” who was secretly receiving government subsidies to tame the civil rights movement and prevent it threatening the Johnson administration. While leading freedom marches under the admiring glare of worldwide television, King was allegedly in close touch with the President. The same operational plan also contained a series of active measures designed to discredit US policy “on the Negro issue.” The Centre authorized Modin:

	- To organize, through the use of KGB residency resources in the US, the publication and distribution of brochures, pamphlets, leaflets and appeals denouncing the policy of the Johnson administration on the Negro question and exposing the brutal terrorist methods being used by the government to suppress the Negro rights movement.
	
	- To arrange, via available agent resources, for leading figures in the legal profession to make public statements discrediting the policy of the Johnson administration on the Negro question.

	- To forge and distribute through illegal channels a document showing that the John Birch Society, in conjunction with the Minuteman organization, is developing a plan for the physical elimination of leading figures in the Negro movement in the US.

	Service A sought to exploit the violent images of the long, hot summers which began in August 1965 with race riots in Watts, the black Los Angeles ghetto, which resulted in thirty-six deaths, left 1,032 injured and caused damage estimated at over 40 million dollars. The Centre seems to have hoped that as violence intensified King would be swept aside by black radicals such as Stokeley Carmichael, who told a meeting of Third World revolutionaries in Cuba in the summer of 1967, “We have a common enemy. Our struggle is to overthrow this system . . . We are moving into open guerrilla warfare in the United States.” Traveling on to North Vietnam, Carmichael declared in Hanoi, “We are not reformists . . . We are revolutionaries. We want to change the American system.

	King’s assassination on April 4, 1968 was quickly followed by the violence and rioting which the KGB had earlier blamed King for trying to prevent. Within a week riots had erupted in over a hundred cities, forty-six people had been killed, 3,500 injured and 20,000 arrested. To “Deke” DeLoach, it seemed that, “The nation was teetering on the brink of anarchy.” Henceforth, instead of dismissing King as an Uncle Tom, Service A portrayed him as a martyr of the black liberation movement and spread conspiracy theories alleging that his murder had been planned by white racists with the connivance of the authorities.’

	Simultaneously the Centre implemented a series of active measures designed to weaken the internal cohesion of the United States and undermine its international reputation by inciting race hatred. In 1971 Andropov personally approved the fabrication of pamphlets full of racist insults purporting to come from the extremist Jewish Defense League, headed by Meir Kahane, calling for a campaign against the “black mongrels” who, it was claimed, were attacking Jews and looting Jewish shops. Thirty pamphlets were mailed to a series of militant black groups in the hope of producing “mass disorders in New York.” At the same time forged letters were sent to sixty black organizations giving fictitious details of atrocities committed by the League against blacks and calling for vengeance against Kahane and his chief lieutenants. Probably to the Centre’s disappointment, Kahane was assassinated some years later, not by a black militant but by an Arab.

	On at least one occasion, the Centre ordered the use of explosives to exacerbate racial tensions in New York. On July 25, 1971 the head of the FCD First (North American) Department, Anatoli Tikhonovich Kireyev, instructed the New York residency to proceed with operation PANDORA: the planting of a delayed-action explosive package in “the Negro section of New York.” Kireyev’s preferred target was “one of the Negro colleges.” After the explosion the residency was ordered to make anonymous telephone calls to two or three black organizations, claiming that the explosion was the work of the Jewish Defense League.

	The attempt to stir up racial tensions in the United States remained part of Service A’s stock-in-trade for the remainder of the Cold War. Before the Los Angeles Olympics in 1984, for example, Line PR officers in the Washington residency mailed bogus communications from the Ku Klux Klan to the Olympic
committees of African and Asian countries.89 Among the racial taunts devised by Service A for inclusion in the mailings was the following:

		THE OLYMPICS-FOR THE WHITES ONLY!
		African monkeys!
		A grand reception awaits you in Los Angeles!
		We are preparing for the Olympic games by shooting at black moving targets.
		In Los Angeles our own Olympic flames are ready to incinerate you.
		The highest award for a true American patriot would be the lynching of an African monkey.
		Blacks, Welcome to the Olympic games in Los Angeles!
		We’ll give you a reception you’ll never forget!

	This and other active measures on the same theme made front-page news in many countries. When Attorney-General William French Smith denounced the letters as KGB forgeries, Moscow predictably feigned righteous indignation at Washington’s anti-Soviet slanders.


https://books.google.com/books/about/The_Sword_and_the_Shield.html?id=9TWUAQ7Xof8C
	The Centre’s confidence that it now possessed a nerve-hold on Western public opinion was reflected in the first three priorities which it laid down for active measures in 1984, the year before Gorbachev became Soviet leader:

	- counteracting attempts by the USA and NATO to destroy the existing military strategic equilibrium and to acquire military superiority over the USSR compromising the aggressive efforts of imperialist groups and their plans for preparing a nuclear missile war . . .

	- deepening disagreements inside NATO . . .

	- exposing before the international community the plans made by the USA to launch a war, its refusal to negotiate in good faith with the USSR on limiting armaments; stimulating further development of the anti-war and anti-missile movements in the West, involving in them influential political and public figures and broad strata of the population, and encouraging these movements to take more decisive and coordinated action


On top of that, Hersh tied the CIA's program with the deeply unpopular Nixon and the Watergate scandal. Nixon had put to writing his desires to spy on students, "radicals," and anti-war dissidents in the infamous Huston plan, which assigned a "Nixonian" (for lack of a better word) motive to the USIC's counterintelligence activities. Although U.S. intelligence had been spying on Soviet "activists" since long before Nixon, Hersh wasted no time in pinning the whole thing on a paranoid, politically-motivated Nixon administration:


http://www.nytimes.com/1974/12/22/archives/huge-cia-operation-reported-in-u-s-against-antiwar-forces-other.html
	...The disclosure of alleged illegal, C.I.A. activities is the first, possible connection to rumors that have been circulating in Washington for some time. A number of mysterious burglaries and incidents have come to light since the breakin at Democratic party headquarters in the Watergate complex on June 17, 1972.

	Duping Charged

	Throughout the public hearings and courtroom testimony on Watergate, Mr. Helms and other high‐level officials said that the C.I.A. had been “duped” into its Watergate involvement by the White House.

	As part of its alleged effort against dissident Americans in the late nineteen‐sixties had early nineteen‐seventies, The Time's sources said, the C.I.A. authorized agents, to follow and photograph participants in antiwar and other demonstrations. The C.I.A. also set up a network of informants who were ordered to penetrate antiwar groups, the sources said.

	At least one avowedly antiwar member of Congress was among those placed under surveillance by the C.I.A., the sources said. Other members of Congress were said to be included in the C.I.A.'s dossier on dissident Americans.

	...Two months ago, Rolling Stone magazine published a lengthy list of more than a dozen unsolved break‐ins and burglaries and suggested that they might be linked to as yet undisclosed C.I.A. or F.B.I. activities.

	Senator Howard H. Baker Jr., Republican of Tennessee, who was vice chairman of the Senate Watergate committee, has publicly spoken of mysterious C.I.A. links to Watergate, The White House transcripts of June 23, 1972, show President Nixon saying to H. R.‐Haldeman, his chief of staff, “Well, we protected Helms from one hell of a lot of things.”

	The remark, commented upon by many officials during recent interviews, could indicate Presidential knowledge about the C.I.A.'s alleged domestic activities.

	The possible Watergate link is but one of many questions posed by the disclosures about the C.I,A. that the Times sources say they believe can be unraveled only by extensive Congressional hearings.


This was a critical moment for America: the country had been rocked by the social movements of the 60's and 70's and increasingly bitter opposition to the Vietnam war, the Pentagon papers and the Watergate scandal had put trust in the Government at a historic low, and now it was revealed that the U.S. Government was spying on the very activists that opposed these unpopular policies and politicians. At the same time many Americans, perhaps for the first time, were hearing claims by some in the nation's intelligence services that the Soviets had a hand in this domestic turmoil.

This should have been a time for the American people to debate some very important questions: How should we, as a nation, counter foreign intelligence services while keeping our own in check? What lengths are acceptable for our intelligence agencies to go in countering foreign agents on American soil? How do we keep a system of governance that protects us both from tyranny by our own government and tyranny from governments abroad?

But the American people never got the chance: The idea of Soviet intervention in U.S. domestic affairs had been mocked and politicized in the press, trust in U.S. military and intelligence agencies had been dragged down with trust in the Nixon administration, and the American people, maybe weary of conflict, were hopeful that the Soviet threat had been solved by détente:


http://www.nytimes.com/1970/07/10/archives/communist-rules-for-revolt-viewed-as-durable-fraud-rules-for.html
	Communist ‘Rules’ For Revolt Viewed As Durable Fraud

	By DONALD JANSON JULY 10, 1970

	Among a spate of broad sides, leaflets and ultraconservative books distributed at the New England Rally for God, Family and Country, which ended earlier this week in Boston, was a stack of flyers labeled “Communist Rules for Revolution.”

	The “rules” call for corrupting the young by stressing sex to the exclusion of moral virtues, fomenting disorder and dissatisfaction with government, legislating gun control and seizing power.

	...The same list has been re produced in right‐wing publications, small‐town newspaper advertisements and gun lobby magazines for a quarter of a century. Group Research, a Washington organization, re ports a spurt in recent months.

	...‘Completely Spurious’

	Senator Lee Metcalf, Democrat of Montana, said in an interview that exhaustive re search had proved the “rules for revolution” to be “completely spurious.”

	“The extreme right wing in America also follows rules,” he said earlier in placing his findings in The Congressional Record, “and one of these rules is to make maximum use of false, misleading and fear inspiring quotations.”

	...Since then, numerous ultra conservative publications have reproduced the “rules” with the Brautigam statement and his signature appended. The Rev. Billy James Hargis devoted the cover of Christian Crusade to this combination a decade later.

	...Those who have listed the “rules” in The Congressional Record this year include Representatives John J. Duncan of Tennessee, Joe Skubitz of Kansas and Louis C. Wyman of New Hampshire.

	‘To Protect Our Country’

	Mr. Duncan commented, in doing so, that “I became alarmed as I reviewed these and realized how effective they are right now in this great country of ours.”

	“We see the results taking place our society,” he said, “and it is our duty to warn our constituency and to protect our country.”

	...Equally popular in right‐wing circles, according to Mr. George of Central State College it Oklahoma, are more than dozen misquotations of Communist leaders.

	He said purveyors of fear frequently quote Nikita S. Khrushchev's remark while in the United States in 1959 that “we will bury you,” but never add that he meant economically.


(note: https://archive.org/stream/BezmenovLoveLetterToAmerica/YuriBezmenov-LoveLetterToAmerica_djvu.txt the document likely is a forgery, although it is pretty accurate in describing some goals/methods of active measures. An interesting question is: forgery by who?)


http://www.newyorker.com/magazine/1972/01/22/i-coverup
	Coverup—I

	By Seymour M. Hersh

	January 22, 1972

	Over the past eighteen months, I have been provided with a complete transcript of the testimony given to the Peers Inquiry, and also with volumes of other materials the Peers commission assembled, including its final summary report to Secretary Resor and General Westmoreland. What follows is based largely on those papers, although I have supplemented them with documents from various sources, including the Army’s Criminal Investigation Division, which had the main responsibility for conducting the initial investigations into both the My Lai massacre and its coverup.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pentagon_Papers
	President Nixon's first reaction to the publication was that, since the study embarrassed the Johnson and Kennedy administrations rather than his, he should do nothing. However, Kissinger convinced the president that not opposing the publication set a negative precedent for future secrets. The administration argued Ellsberg and Russo were guilty of a felony under the Espionage Act of 1917, because they had no authority to publish classified documents. After failing to persuade the Times to cease voluntarily publication on June 14, Attorney General John N. Mitchell and Nixon obtained a federal court injunction forcing the Times to cease publication...


http://www.ifstone.org/collectedifstone.pdf
	The Crisis Coming for a Free Press

	I.F. Stone

	July 9, 1971

	...A government cannot be denied the right to some secrets, especially in wartime. But what makes this case so crucial is that Dr. Ellsberg’s leak and its publication in the press represented the first open revolt against a system of secrecy which has reached cancerous proportions and threatens unless checked to destroy free government itself. The amount of information now stamped secret and withheld from the press and Congress is staggering. 

	...The Pentagon Papers showed that the government has been carrying on secret warfare in Indo-China since 1954. They disclosed for the first time the full dimensions of the arrogance, duplicity and inhumanity with which successive Administrations got us into this horrible mess which is tearing the country apart and demoralizing the armed forces themselves.

	...Representative government is menaced today by a cloud of secrecy. The Daniel Ellsbergs and Neil Sheehans are too few; a Senator like Gravel willing to challenge the classification system in which Congress has acquiesced for so many years, is unique. We need more such rebels, not fewer, if free government is to survive.


(background on Stone, previously mentioned: http://www.mitpressjournals.org/doi/pdf/10.1162/jcws.2009.11.3.144)


http://www.ifstone.org/collectedifstone.pdf
	Fresh Light on the Mystery of the Missiles

	I.F. Stone

	1963

	The removal of the missiles stirred anger among the Fidelistas, and I was told that Fidel had gone several times to the University to appeal to the students to be quiet. Cubans made up a little poem which went like this:

		Nikita, Nikita,
		Lo que se da,
		No se quita

	i.e., Nikita, Nikita, what you gave, you can’t take back. In the eyes of the Fidelistas, the purpose of the missiles was simply to deter an American attack; they turned against us our own favorite theory of deterrence.

	...The political questions were as delicate as the military. The Russians had agreed to remove the missiles without consulting Castro. For a man—and a people—as sensitive about their national dignity, this was an affront. An island besieged by the United States, and so dependent on the U.S.S.R., could hardly afford open discussion of such questions.

	...As for the Russians, their friendliness for Cuba in no way interferes with their obvious desire for friendlier relations with the United States. These talks in Havana showed me that wherever American policy was to some degree flexible and pragmatic, rather than rigidly ideological, this paid off.

	...One way to look at the recent crisis is that we were brought to the brink of thermonuclear war because we had driven an island neighbor so far into fear and enmity that it was willing to emplace nuclear missiles against us.

	Every time we are confronted with a new revolution we take to the opium pipes of our own propaganda. Those who try to be objective or friendly are dismissed as dupes, and sometimes—as the Stalin years demonstrate—they were. But events have also shown that in the long run the dupes prove less misleading than the doped.


https://books.google.com/books?id=-ZiMFkQ1hjkC&pg=PA145
	His rhetoric, spurred by the support of the Soviet Union and the increasingly socialist leanings of Castro, became even more radical. In a particularly chilling speech to the First Latin American Youth Congress in late July 1960, Che saw it fit to speak of Cuba as a whole, saying that "if they [the Cuban people] should disappear from the face of the earth because an atomic war is unleashed in their names ... they would feel completely happy and fulfilled ..." The threat of atomic annihilation would soon be a very real one--not just for Cuba, but in essence, the world.


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-srv/inatl/longterm/summit/archive/com1972-1.htm
	Joint Communiqué, Moscow, 1972

	Guided by the desire to place U.S.-Soviet relations on a more stable and constructive foundation, and mindful of their responsibilities for maintaining world peace and for facilitating the relaxation of international tension, the two Sides adopted a document entitled: "Basic Principles of Mutual Relations between the United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics," signed on behalf of the U.S. by President Nixon and on behalf of the U.S.S.R. by General Secretary Brezhnev.

	...Both Sides are also convinced that the agreement on Measures to Reduce the Risk of Outbreak of Nuclear War Between the USA and the U.S.S.R., signed in Washington on September 30, 1971, serves the interests not only of the Soviet and American peoples, but of all mankind. 


http://www.nybooks.com/articles/1973/10/18/the-sakharov-campaign/
	The Sakharov Campaign
	I.F. Stone	
	October 18, 1973 Issue

	Andrei Sakharov is no enemy of détente. On the contrary, complete and genuine détente, ideological as well as political coexistence, has been one of the two objectives of the extraordinary campaign he has been waging since 1968.


https://www.jstor.org/stable/2749027?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents
	The polls: American Attitudes Toward the Soviet Union and Communism

	1983

	During the first half of the 1970s détente warmed Soviet-American relations. A series of major treaties from the SALT I accords in 1972 to the Helsinki Agreements in July 1975 raised the promise of peaceful coexistence and normalized relations. Since then Soviet-American relations have chilled in the face of the huge Soviet arms buildup, Russian-Cuban adventurism in Africa, the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, and Communist repression in Poland, and commentators are talking of a second cold war.


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/97unclass/colby.html
	...By that time, mid-1973, public attitudes with respect to US intelligence had begun to shift, and some past practices, particularly those relating to covert operations, no longer enjoyed wide support. Rightly or wrongly, a certain euphoria about détente signified to many that there was now a less overriding need for continuing covert operations as a ready, effective weapon in our country's Cold War arsenal. Public support waned further when Colby himself confirmed existing suspicions about certain past CIA practices. Public dismay about Watergate had rubbed off on CIA as well, in light of the many allegations that the Agency had been involved in that scandal. 


The public didn't get a chance or didn't want to hear about Soviet active measures--they were more angry at the CIA. In the critical debate for the nation's future, Americans only got to hear one side of the story. Schlesinger and Colby did little to help:


https://www.commentarymagazine.com/articles/the-war-within-the-cia/
	How had the “family jewels” ever leaked to the New York Times in the first place? This was a question put to Colby in 1975 by Richard M. Helms, himself a former Director of the CIA. According to Helms’s recollection of their conversation, Colby nonchalantly replied, “I talked to Sy Hersh.” At the time, Helms did not fully comprehend what Colby meant by this admission. It seemed almost inconceivable to him that the Director of the CIA, whom he had always found to be an intelligent, discreet, and completely responsible officer, and who had sworn an oath to protect the nation’s secrets, could have revealed such critical information to a newspaperman for purposes of publication. Yet the next time Helms saw Colby, he again asked him about the leak and Colby reiterated that he had confirmed the story to Hersh and the New York Times.

	That it was Colby himself who had engineered the leak had also become clear in the meantime to members of the CIA’s counterintelligence staff who had been forced to resign on account of it. Newton S. Miler, then Chief of Operations for Counterintelligence, discovered that Colby’s report to the President had been prepared within a day of the story’s appearance in the Times. Analyzing the research that had gone into the document, he concluded that Colby could not possibly have written it within such a brief period.

	...In the interview, Colby asserts, he attempted to “explain—and put in proper perspective” both the CIA’s investigation of the anti-war movement in the United States and the CIA’s surveillance of American citizens by “wiretaps, mail intercepts,” and other means. He acknowledges confirming to Hersh that the CIA had, in the case of the mail intercepts, sometimes violated its charter (and the law). He provided Hersh with incriminating details about the CIA’s program of intercepting letters to and from the Soviet Union, and about other highly-classified and illegal surveillance activities.

	Colby says that he did not realize the public release of this information would have the “traumatic consequences” it did. The only reason he told Hersh about it, he writes, was to lay to rest rumors which Hersh had heard of even more incriminating activities on the part of the CIA. 


http://www.nytimes.com/1974/12/22/archives/huge-cia-operation-reported-in-u-s-against-antiwar-forces-other.html
	By SEYMOUR M. HERSH DEC. 22, 1974 

	Mr. Colby has reportedly told associates that he is considering the possibility of asking the Attorney General to institute legal action against some of those who had been involved in the alleged domestic activities.

	...Mr. Colby refused comment on the domestic spying issue. But one clue to the depth of his feelings emerged during an off‐the‐record talk he gave Monday night at the Council on Foreign Relations in New York.

	The C.I.A. chief, who had been informed the previous week of the inquiry by The Times, said at the meeting that he had ordered a complete investigation of the agency's domestic activities and had found some improprieties.

	But he is known to have added, “I think family skeletons are best left where they are—in the closet.”


http://www.nytimes.com/1975/10/16/archives/colby-concedes-cia-failed-to-report-watergate-promptly.html
	Colby Concedes C.I.A. Failed To Report Watergate Promptly

 	SPECIAL TO THE NEW YORK TIMES OCT. 16, 1975 


https://www.theatlantic.com/magazine/archive/1979/08/inside-the-department-of-dirty-tricks/305460/
	 Schlesinger did not remain long at the CIA; On May 9, 1973, Nixon appointed him to replace Elliot Richardson at the Department of Defense, who was replacing Richard Kleindienst at the Department of Justice, who was resigning because his old friend John Mitchell was finally facing indictment for his role in the Watergate scandal. But during Schlesinger's brief tenure as DCI, the shortest in the Agency's history, he fired more than a thousand officers throughout the Agency, more than a hundred of them old soldiers in the DDP/DDO.

	The firings came in waves: If the pace wasn't brisk enough, he would do the job himself, going down a list of officers and saying, "He's been here twenty years that's long enough, out." 


http://www.nytimes.com/1974/12/22/archives/huge-cia-operation-reported-in-u-s-against-antiwar-forces-other.html
	By SEYMOUR M. HERSH DEC. 22, 1974 

	...Mr. Schlesinger was at the C.I.A. when the first word of the agency's involvement in the September, 1971, burglary of the office of Dr. Daniel Ellsberg's former psychiatrist by the White House security force known as the “plumbers” became known.

	...The associate said one result of Mr. Schlesinger's inquiries into Watergate and the domestic of the C.I.A. operations was his executive edict ordering a halt to all questionable counterintelligence operations inside the United States.

	During his short stay at the C.I.A., Mr. Schlesinger also initiated a 10 per cent employee cutback. Because of his actions, the associate said, security officials at the agency decided to increase the number of his personal bodyguards. It could not be learned whether that action was taken after a threat.


https://www.commentarymagazine.com/articles/the-war-within-the-cia/
	The Hersh story was based on a closely-held CIA report done the previous year by the Inspector General, which was a compilation of all the CIA’s questionable activities prior to 1973 and which was termed by Colby the “family jewels.”

	Within forty-eight hours of publication of the Times exposé, Colby effectively confirmed the veracity of the story by announcing the resignation of James Jesus Angleton, the CIA’s chief of counterintelligence, who had been mentioned in Hersh’s report, as well as Angleton’s three top deputies on the counterintelligence staff;


http://www.nytimes.com/1974/12/30/archives/3-more-aides-quit-in-cia-shakeup-faced-transfers-special-to-the-new.html
	3 MORE AIDES QUIT IN C.I.A. SHAKE‐UP; FACED TRANSFERS

	By SEYMOUR M. HERSH DEC. 30, 1974

	Three more high‐ranking officials of the Central Intelligence Agency resigned last week in a major shake‐up of the agency's counterintelligence division, well‐informed Government sources said today.

	...In a related development, Senator William Proxmire, Democrat of Wisconsin, said today that he had received independent verification of the allegations of C.I.A. domestic spying that were initially published Dec. 22 in the Times. There has been no official denial or confirmation of The Times's account from the Ford Administration.

	“I can say on the basis of the information I have, and I think it is very good Information,” Mr. Proxmire said on “Issues and Answers,” the ABC‐TV interview show, “that the stories and the allegations in The New York Times about the file of 10,000 names of people who had been under investigation by the C.I.A., about the surveillance, about the breaking and entering and about wiretaps, that those are accurate and correct.”


http://www.nytimes.com/1987/05/12/obituaries/james-angleton-counterintelligence-figure-dies.html
	Mr. Angleton ... was forced to resign his post in 1974 by William E. Colby, then Director of Central Intelligence, who had become convinced that Mr. Angleton's efforts were harming the agency. 

	...With his departure, the agency cut the counterintelligence staff to 80 from 300, and turned away from some of the techniques he had pioneered. Today, some intelligence officials and members of Congress say this may have been an overreaction. They say that the recent disclosures about highly damaging Soviet espionage operations suggest that Mr. Angleton was more accurate in his suspicions than was once believed


http://www.nytimes.com/1987/04/10/us/washington-talk-a-counter-spymaster-s-view-assessing-intelligence-breaches.html
	At its peak in the 1960's, he tells friends, the counterintelligence directorate had a staff of 300. In the reductions sought by Mr. Colby, the staff went from 280 to 80, terminating many of its operations and virtually paralyzing those remaining. "It's never been built up again," he said.


CIA director Colby had compiled a list of the CIA's darkest secrets, leaked them to a likely Soviet agent, then began firing most of the CIA's counterintelligence staff a few days later, crippling U.S. defense against spies and giving the impression the CIA was guilty of the skewed charges in Hersh's report.

For the CIA, it was a bloodbath. Colby and Congress took it even further:


https://www.maryferrell.org/pages/Post-Watergate_Intelligence_Investigations.html
	Leading newspapers like the New York Times and Washington Post, which had covered Watergate extensively, carried articles exposing the illegalities. The New York Times carried a front-page story on 22 Dec 1974 by Seymour Hersh entitled "Huge C.I.A. Operation Reported in U.S. Against Antiwar Forces, Other Dissidents in Nixon Years."

	A Presidential commission and several Congressional committees, the most famous of which was headed by Senator Frank Church of Idaho, held hearings and produced reports over the next few years.


https://www.senate.gov/artandhistory/history/common/investigations/ChurchCommittee.htm
	Senate Select Committee to Study Governmental Operations with Respect to Intelligence Activities
	
	(The Church Committee)

	Origins

	...In 1974 Pulitzer Prize winning journalist Seymour Hersh published a front-page New York Times article...


https://books.google.com/books?id=oM8u2198DcsC&pg=PT144
	On January 27, the Senate voted 82 to 4 to form the Select Committee to Study Governmental Operations with Respect to Intelligence Activities, chaired by Idaho Democrat Frank Church, which became known as the Church Committee. The House moved to establish the Select Committee on Intelligence, chaired by New York Democrat Otis Pike. The star witness would be CIA director William Colby.

	...To some people in the agency, Colby's performances before Congress were at best designed to cripple the intelligence community. At worst, as hallway murmurings attested, Colby's testimony was tantamount to treason. According to his memoirs, Colby was convinced "that [the Rockefeller Commission, convened by President Ford, which preceded the Church Committee] would not be the end of the matter, and that the President's carefully circumscribed investigation of CIA's domestic affairs would not stop Congress from conducting its own probe . . . the atmosphere in the nation had far too radically changed--in the aftermath of Vietnam and Watergate--for the Executive Branch to get away, as it always had in the past, with keeping the cloak-and-dagger world of intelligence strictly in its own prerogative and affair . . . Intelligence," he mused, "was entering a new era, and the country was in the process of redefining its correct position under the Constitution." And so, in his testimonies before the investigative committees, Colby was far more forthright than any of his predecessors.

	Before the Rockefeller Commission, Colby revealed so much that the commission's chairman, Vice President Nelson Rockefeller, pulled him aside and said, "Bill, do you really have to present all this material to us? We realize that there are secrets that you fellows need to keep and so nobody here is going to take it amiss if you feel that there are some questions you can't answer quite as fully as you seem to feel you have to." In his memoirs, wrote Colby, "I got the message quite unmistakably and I didn't like it. The Vice-President of the United States was letting me know that he didn't approve of my approach to the CIA's troubles, that he would much prefer me to take a traditional stance of fending off investigators by drawing a cloak of secrecy around the agency in the name of national security."


https://www.maryferrell.org/pages/Post-Watergate_Intelligence_Investigations.html
	In February 1975, the same month the Rockefeller Commission was launched, the House Select Committee on Intelligence was formed under the leadership of Michigan Representative Lucien Nedzi. Only a few months had passed when the New York Times revealed that Nedzi, as head of the House Armed Services Intelligence Subcommittee, had been briefed in 1973 by CIA Director Colby on some of the contents of the "family jewels," including assassination plotting. The resulting furor expressed by other members of the Committee resulted in the Committee being dissolved in July and replaced by one run by Otis Pike of New York.


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/winter98_99/art07.html
	...What he wanted, he told Colby, was to build public and Congressional understanding and support for intelligence by "exposing" as much as possible of its nature without doing harm to proper intelligence activities. Pike related to Colby that he knew the investigation would cause "occasional conflict between us, but that a constructive approach by both sides should resolve it." 

	...While the Church Committee centered its intention on the more sensational charges of illegal activities by the CIA and other components of the IC, the Pike Committee set about ex~mining the CIA's effectiveness and its costs to taxpayers. Unfortunately, Representative Pike, the committee, and its staff never developed a cooperative working relationship with the Agency or the Ford administration.


https://books.google.com/books?id=iqptFbH1ndAC&pg=PA161
	Johnson's views on the intelligence community summarized the feelings of the nine-member majority:
		They were lying sons of bitches. They lie every chance they get. They are no-good people. They are no goddamn good. [Former DCI Richard] Helms lies to Congress, gets convicted of perjury, and says he will wear his conviction like a "bade of honor." I went out with staff one day to CIA headquarters. I told [CIA official Seymour] Bolten: "You, the CIA, are the enemy." The military establishment dominates this country today.

	...Mr. Dellums stated what he would like to see the committee do: "I think this committee ought to come down hard and clear on the side of stopping any intelligence agency in this country from utilizing corruption, and prostituting the media, the church and our educational system."


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/winter98_99/art07.html
	...Privately, Pike indicated that he believed the Agency was a "rogue elephant" out of control, as Senator Church had charged publicly. It needed to be restrained and major reporting reforms initiated.

	...An underlying problem was the large cultural gap between officers trained in the early years of the Cold War and the young staffers of the anti-Vietnam and civil rights movements of the late 1960s and early 1970s.

	...Under orders from the White House, CIA officials refused to testify in open session before the committee on these operations, declaring that such hearings would only benefit foreign intelligence services.

	The committee instead heard from Congressman Michael Harrington and Harvard law professor Roger Fisher, both of whom called for the outlawing of all covert action; former National Security Adviser McGeorge Bundy, who opposed covert action in peacetime; and historian Arthur Schlesinger, Jr., who claimed that the CIA was indeed "a rogue elephant" and who suggested that the only remedy was to impose strict executive and legislative oversight and drastically cut the intelligence budget as the ways to curb covert actions.


https://books.google.com/books?id=oM8u2198DcsC&pg=PT144
	Colby believed that if the CIA was going to survive, he had to cooperate with Congress. Stonewalling Congress, he thought, would challenge them to dismantle the agency altogether. By employing a policy of moderate openness with the committees, Colby reasoned, he could get Congress to "buy into" the intelligence community.

	...the Rockefeller Commission strongly suggested that the black budget was unconstitutional: "Congress should give careful consideration to whether the budget of the CIA should not, at least to some extent, be made public, particularly in view of the provisions of Article I, Section 9, Clause 7 of the Constitution."

	During the hearings, DCI Colby explained that the black budget was legal in his opinion.


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/winter98_99/art07.html
	The Pike Group's final report concluded that the foreign intelligence budget was three or four times than Congress had been told; that money appropriated for the IC was hidden throughout the entire Federal budget; that the total amount of funds expended on intelligence was extremely difficult to determine; and that Congressional and executive scrutiny of the budget ranged between "cursory and nonexistent."
	...The budget issue was only one major question raised by the Pike Committee. The committee also wanted to know just how effective the CIA and US intelligence had been over the past 10 years. 

	...the committee was critical of the performance of US intelligence ... For example, using the Agency's own postmortems on the Yom Kippur war, the committee found that the "principal conclusions concerning the commencement of hostilities...were--quite simply, obviously, and starkly--wrong." In earlier testimony before the committee, Colby admitted that, "We did not cover ourselves with glory. We predicted the day before the war broke out that it was not going to break out."

	...Colby expressed his continuing belief that the committee would find that the main thrust of US intelligence was "good, solid, and trustworthy."

	Pike responded that he had no intention of destroying US intelligence.


http://spartacus-educational.com/JFKpikeO.htm
	Three days later the House of Representatives voted 246 to 124 to direct the Pike Committee not to release its report until it "has been certified by the President as not containing information which would adversely affect the intelligence activities of the CIA." Pike was furious and pointed out: "The House just voted not to release a document it had not read. Our committee voted to release a document it had read."

	Worried that the report would never be published, someone on the House Select Intelligence Committee leaked the report to Daniel Schorr. He gave it to The Village Voice, which published it in full on 16th February 1976 under the title "The Report on the CIA that President Ford Doesn't Want You to Read."


http://www.nybooks.com/articles/1975/02/20/a-new-solution-for-the-cia/
	A New Solution for the CIA
	I.F. Stone	
	February 20, 1975 Issue

	Stalin did establish one useful precedent. He made it a practice to bump off whoever served as head of his secret police. He never let anybody stay in the job too long. As a successful dictator, Stalin seems to have felt that anybody who had collected so many secrets would be a No. 1 menace to security if he ever went sour. Stalin thought it safer not to wait.

	I think we ought to take Stalin’s example one step further. I think we ought to get rid of the CIA altogether, lock, stock, and burglar’s kit.


https://www.commentarymagazine.com/articles/the-war-within-the-cia/
	The impact of these investigations on the normal activities of the CIA was “devastating,” as William Colby explains in his autobiography: “Apart from the fact that I and any number of my senior associates were constantly being called away from Langley to testify before one committee or another, the agency overall was diverted from its responsibilities by the deluge of demands from the hordes of investigators, with literally hundreds of CIA officers reassigned from normal intelligence operations to handle the mechanical and clerical chores of locating requested documents, sanitizing them to remove names of agents and particularly sensitive operational material, and then negotiating whether or not the information could be publicly released.” According to other former executives of the CIA, the multiple investigations did much more than merely paralyze the CIA temporarily. They resulted in completely demoralizing its staff, disrupting its relations with other Western intelligence services on whom it depended for all practical purposes, wrecking it as a viable intelligence service.


http://www.nytimes.com/1975/11/10/archives/new-jersey-pages-cias-work-unimpeded-by-inquiries-and-reports.html
	C.I.A.'s Work Unimpeded By Inquiries and Reports, Officials of Agency Assert

	By SEYMOUR M. HERSH NOV. 10, 1975 

	Colby Praised

	Mr. Colby has been widely praised for his consistent efforts to cooperate with the various investigating committees that were set up this year, although his approach is known to have angered many associates and friends of Richard Helms


https://washington.blogs.nytimes.com/2007/06/27/perspective-on-the-jewels-from-the-cias-chief-historian/
	Perspective on the Jewels From the C.I.A.’s Chief Historian
	By David Robarge June 27, 2007

	For more than 30 years, the Family Jewels have clouded the C.I.A.’s reputation, even though most of their contents have long been known from official reports and ad hoc disclosures. William Colby — who oversaw the compilation of the Jewels while serving as the agency’s operations chief and director-designate — is the source of some durable misconceptions about them. In his memoir, Honorable Men (p. 340), Colby says that the Jewels consist of “693 pages of possible violations of, or at least questionable activities in regard to, the C.I.A.’s legislative charter”; that among the contents are “bizarre and tragic cases wherein the Agency experimented with mind-control drugs”; and that accompanying them was “a separate and even more secret annex” that “summarized a 1967 survey of C.I.A.’s involvement in assassination attempts or plans against Castro, Lumumba and Trujillo.”

	These misstatements were repeated at least in part in several widely read works, including Thomas Powers’s The Man Who Kept the Secrets, John Ranelagh’s The Agency, G.J.A. O’Toole’s Encyclopedia of American Intelligence and Espionage, and Norman Polmar and Thomas Allen’s Spy Book. 
	
	...The release of the Jewels should end much of the mythology about them.

	...These final records — several of them in Colby’s own hand — make an unintentionally fitting conclusion to the Jewels collection, the product of a process he orchestrated as a damage control exercise but which almost proved to be the agency’s undoing.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/collection/family-jewels
	Widely known as the "Family Jewels," this document consists of almost 700 pages of responses from CIA employees to a 1973 directive from Director of Central Intelligence James Schlesinger asking them to report activities they thought might be inconsistent with the Agency's charter. Also available in PDF format (this file is 28MB, so please be patient while it downloads).


http://ndupress.ndu.edu/Portals/68/Documents/stratperspective/inss/Strategic-Perspectives-11.pdf
	The revelations about intelligence programs transgressing American civil liberties ushered in a period of intense public and congressional scrutiny. The scandals forced a reevaluation of the role of intelligence organizations in a free society. What emerged in the aftermath of the debate was a new American conception of intelligence that further inclined the national security system to ignore Soviet disinformation. 

	...Colby’s reforms ... effectively downgraded the importance of disinformation and deception. First, Colby decided in favor of complete openness, revealing all the tawdry secrets of the CIA (sometimes referred to as “the Family Jewels”), ranging from failed assassination attempts of foreign leaders to spying on American citizens. ...Colby oversaw a reprioritization of intelligence functions that reduced the emphasis on covert action, counterintelligence, and human intelligence sources in favor greater reliance on technical means of collecting information and better analysis. Past public support for covert action had evaporated, and “rightly or wrongly, a certain euphoria about détente signified to many that there was now [less need for] covert operations as a ready, effective weapon in our country’s Cold War arsenal.”

	...These developments had the effect of reducing CIA attention to covert Soviet disinformation activities such as the use of forgeries and other propaganda tools to influence foreign audiences. ...In their view, the reforms amounted to unilateral intelligence “disarmament.” In the words of one intelligence traditionalist, the CIA’s counterintelligence staff basically “lobotomized itself.”


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/97unclass/colby.html
	In short, Colby's effort to strengthen US intelligence through candor was seriously constrained from many sides. His revelations fueled the excesses of the Church and Pike committees, fed the public's misconceptions about the purposes of US intelligence, and weakened the country's support of intelligence--at least for some time thereafter.


The excess of Colby and the Pike and Church Committees helped shift the debate on how counterintelligence should be conducted in a free society to whether or not the CIA should exist at all. The results were reforms that "lobotomized" the agency. For all his talk of the CIA's controversial programs, Colby apparently did little to explain why a well-meaning person could support them or to inform the public of the scope and nature of the Soviet threat, as he didn't think it existed:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/entertainment/books/1978/04/23/agents-assassins-and-moles/20915ac6-cfb3-436f-944b-56d3288bbb02/
	What former CIA Director William E. Colby has described as Angelton's "ultraconspiratorial" view of the world is apparently no longer in vogue at the agency. But if his theories were doubted (Colby, for one, believed they did the CIA more harm than good), his brilliance never was. Even today, no one in the intelligence community seems brash enough to assert that Angleton didn't know what he was talking about. He seems to have kept too many secrets to himself, hoarding them like ammunition. In any case, professional disagreement with the CIA's chief of counterintelligence was always cautiously stated.

	In his own forthcoming book, Honorable Men: My Life in the CIA, Colby puts it this way:

	"I spent several long sessions doing my best to follow his torturous conspiracy theories about the long arm of a powerful and wily KBG at work, over decades, placing its agents in the heart of allied and neutral nations and sending its false defectors to influence and undermine American policy.I confess that I couldn't quite absorb it, possibly because I did not have the requisite grasp of this labyrinthine subject, possibly because Angleton's explanations were impossible to follow, or possibly because the evidence just didn't add up to his conclusions; and I finally concluded that the last was the only real answer. At the same time, I looked in vain for some tangible results in the counterintelligence field, and found little or none. I did not suspect Angleton and his staff of engaging in improper activities. I just could not figure out what they were doing at all."


The sum of Colby's interactions with the public were to increase animosity toward the CIA and to confuse and diminish public knowledge of Soviet espionage activities. Unfortunately, the same can be said for Angleton:


http://www.aarclibrary.org/publib/church/reports/vol2/html/ChurchV2_0034a.htm
	Church Committee Reports

	...Senator Mondale. All right. What was your understanding of the legality of the covert mail operation?
	Mr. Angleton. That it was illegal.

	Senator Mondale. It was illegal. Now, you are an attorney? 

	Mr. Angleton. No, I am not, sir. 

	Senator Mondale. Well, that might be an asset. 

	Mr. Angleton. That is my cover, Senator. 

	Senator Mondale. How do you rationalize conducting a program which you believe to be illegal?

	Mr. Angleton. To begin with, I was taking it over as an ongoing operation and there was probability that the program, through lack of personnel and funding, would have been scrubbed at some stage. From the counterintelligence point of view, we believe that it was extremely important to know everything possible regarding contacts of American citizens with Communist countries. 

	And second, that we believed that the security of the operation was such that the Soviets were unaware of such a program and therefore that many of the interests that the Soviets would have in the United States, subversive and otherwise, would be through the open mails, when their own adjudication was that the mails could not be violated. 

	Senator Mondale. So that a judgment was made, with which you concurred, that although covert mail opening was illegal, the good that flowed from it, in terms of the anticipating threats to this country through the use of this counterintelligence technique, made it worthwhile nevertheless. 

	Mr. Angleton. That is correct.


http://press-pubs.uchicago.edu/founders/documents/v1ch4s5.html
	John Adams, Thoughts on Government
	Apr. 1776

	The foundation of every government is some principle or passion in the minds of the people. The noblest principles and most generous affections in our nature then, have the fairest chance to support the noblest and most generous models of government.

	...the very definition of a Republic, is "an Empire of Laws, and not of men." That, as a Republic is the best of governments, so that particular arrangement of the powers of society, or in other words that form of government, which is best contrived to secure an impartial and exact execution of the laws, is the best of Republics.


http://www.aarclibrary.org/publib/church/reports/vol2/html/ChurchV2_0034a.htm
	Senator Mondale. How do you recommend that this committee deal with this profound crisis between political and legal responsibility in government, a nation that believes in the laws, and what you regard to be the counterintelligence imperative of illegal activity? What do we do about it? 

	Mr. Angleton. My own belief has always been that, high authority, whether it be on the Hill, the Congress, or in the Executive, needs to examine very closely the counterintelligence content available to this Government regarding its adversaries, and regarding the Soviet and the Soviet Bloc. 

	To my knowledge, there has never been such an examination. I believe very much in a statement made by Director of the FBI, Mr. Kelley, that it is his firm view, which he expressed in Canada at a bar association convention, that certain individual rights have to be sacrificed for the national security. 

	Senator Mondale. Do you believe that national security cannot be protected except through the sacrifice of these rights? 

	Mr. Angleton. I believe that all matters dealing with counter-espionage require very sophisticated handling and require considerable latitude. 

	Senator Mondale. Who do you think should be empowered to determine which rights should be set aside? 

	Mr. Angleton. I think that, sir, not being an expert in these matters, that it should be a combination of the Executive and the Congress. 

	Senator Mondale. How would the Congress express itself? Traditionally, it is through the adoption of laws. 

	Mr. Angleton. I am afraid I do not--


http://franklinpapers.org/franklin/framedVolumes.jsp?vol=6&page=238a
	[Correspondence of Benjamin Franklin]

	Those who would give up essential Liberty, to purchase a little temporary Safety, deserve neither Liberty nor Safety.


(An aside: Benjamin Wittes has some weird ideas about what that quote means:

https://www.lawfareblog.com/what-ben-franklin-really-said
	What Ben Franklin Really Said
	By Benjamin Wittes 

	...I started looking into this quotation because I am writing a frontal attack on the idea that liberty and security exist in some kind of "balance" with one another--and the quotation is kind of iconic to the balance thesis. Indeed, Franklin's are perhaps the most famous words ever written about the relationship. A version of them is engraved on the Statue of Liberty. They are quoted endlessly by those who assert that these two values coexist with one another in a precarious, ever-shifting state of balance that security concerns threaten ever to upset.

	...Very few people who quote these words, however, have any idea where they come from or what Franklin was really saying...

	...In short, Franklin was not describing some tension between government power and individual liberty. He was describing, rather, effective self-government in the service of security as the very liberty it would be contemptible to trade. Notwithstanding the way the quotation has come down to us, Franklin saw the liberty and security interests of Pennsylvanians as aligned.


I'm not sure what Wittes is talking about. As far as I can tell from his letter, Franklin was upset that the King was twisting Pennsylvania's arm, making them jump through hoops and infringing on their liberty just so they could fund their security. I think Franklin was saying that if you play that game and give in to that you don't deserve liberty or security.

Wittes's take on the quote says a lot about him, and maybe his associates too.)


http://www.history.org/foundation/journal/winter09/rights.cfm
	John Adams, then in England, who wrote to Thomas Jefferson, then in Paris, “What think you of a Declaration of Rights? Should not such a Thing have preceded the Model?” Jefferson agreed: he found much to like about the new plan for a federal government, but he objected to “the omission of a bill of rights.” He wrote to his fellow Virginian, James Madison, the Constitution’s primary author, that “a bill of rights is what the people are entitled to against every government on earth, general or particular, & what no government should refuse, or rest on inference.” Events proved that Adams and Jefferson, from across the Atlantic, were more in tune with popular opinion than the members of the Constitutional Convention. Soon people throughout America were clamoring for a list of individual rights, refusing to base their fundamental freedoms on “inference.” But nearly as many were vocal in their struggle against any such list.

	We cannot assume that those who fought against a bill of rights were reactionary, undemocratic, or anti-American, for some of the fiercest opposition came from the most passionate civil libertarians. Some said a bill of rights would not guarantee but restrict freedoms—that a list of specific rights would imply that they were granted by the government rather than inherent in nature. 


http://teachingamericanhistory.org/library/document/a-dissertation-on-the-canon-and-feudal-law/
	A Dissertation on the Canon and Feudal Law

	John Adams

	The poor people, it is true, have been much less successful than the great. They have seldom found either leisure or opportunity to form a union and exert their strength; ignorant as they were of arts and letters, they have seldom been able to frame and support a regular opposition. This, however, has been known by the great to be the temper of mankind; and they have accordingly labored, in all ages, to wrest from the populace, as they are contemptuously called, the knowledge of their rights and wrongs, and the power to assert the former or redress the latter. I say RIGHTS, for such they have, undoubtedly, antecedent to all earthly government, — Rights, that cannot be repealed or restrained by human laws — Rights, derived from the great Legislator of the universe.


http://www.aarclibrary.org/publib/church/reports/vol2/html/ChurchV2_0039b.htm
	The Chairman. May I call your attention to it on page 109 of your testimony before this committee, September 12, beginning on line 9, and I read, “It is inconceivable that a secret intelligence arm of the Government has to comply with all of the overt orders of the Government.” 

	Mr. Angleton. I withdraw that statement. 

	The Chairman. Do you withdraw that statement? 

	Mr. Angleton. I do. 

	The Chairman. Did you not mean it when you said it the first time? 

	Mr. Angleton. This was stated before the hearings, before you held your hearings on this matter? 
	The Chairman. Yes, but when you said it to us, did you mean it or did you not mean it? 

	Mr. Angleton. I do not know how to respond to that question. 

	The Chairman. You do not know how to respond to the question? 

	Mr. Angleton. I said that I withdrew the statement. 

	The Chairman. Very well, but you are unwilling to say whether or not you meant it when you said it. 

	Mr. Angleton. I would say that the entire speculation should not have been indulged in. 


https://history.hanover.edu/courses/excerpts/111federalist.html
	Federalist Number 10

	James Madison

	 ...A republic, by which I mean a government in which the scheme of representation takes place, opens a different prospect, and promises the cure for which we are seeking.

	...to refine and enlarge the public views, by passing them through the medium of a chosen body of citizens, whose wisdom may best discern the true interest of their country, and whose patriotism and love of justice will be least likely to sacrifice it to temporary or partial considerations.


http://www.aarclibrary.org/publib/church/reports/vol2/html/ChurchV2_0040b.htm
	Senator Morgan. Mr. Angleton, did you at that time consider the mail coverage indispensable to your job? 

	Mr. Angleton. I believed it was one of the few resources, routine in nature, available to counterintelligence. 

	Senator Morgan. Well, Senator Mondale asked you about your rationale behind opening the mail. How do you reconcile it with the rights of the individuals in this country under our Constitution? How did you reconcile your action? 

	Mr. Angleton. Well, Senator, I reconciled it in terms of the knowledge I had, and my colleagues had, regarding the nature of the threat. 

	Senator Morgan. Well, assuming, Mr. Angleton, that you were justified in your actions, which I don’t think you were, but assuming that, what is to prevent some other individual from deciding on his own that such activities are justified? And what is to prevent him from carrying out such activities? 

	Mr. Angleton. Senator, I don’t want to quibble. But I will have to say the operation was in being 3 years before I entered the scene. It was not something of an individual initiative, it was a group of like-minded men who arrived at similar and the same conclusions that this was an indispensable means of collecting foreign intelligence on the Soviets, who regard this country to be the main enemy, and, together with the Soviet bloc, coordinates their activities on their ideological basis. This is very persuasive to someone who has given up 31 years of their life with certain very high ideals for this country. When I left the Army, as many of us did, I believed that we were in the dawn of a millenium. When I look at the map today and the weakness of power of this country, that is what shocks me. 


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/vol53no4/201ccunning-passages-contrived-corridors201d.html
	Angleton possessed a brilliant intellect and extensive knowledge of current and historical Soviet operations, although his sometimes convoluted descriptions of case histories affected people differently. While his colleague William Hood said that he “would sometimes add a full dimension” to an operational discussion, former DCI James Schlesinger recalled that listening to him was “like looking at an Impressionist painting.”

	...Many people will remember Angleton only for two of his last publicized appearances: drunk, disheveled, and disoriented when a media mob confronted him at his home the morning after he was fired; and cagey, elusive, and defiant while testifying before the Church Committee several months later. Very quickly after he left Langley, an anti-Angleton orthodoxy set in at the Agency and coincided with the intelligence scandals of the mid-1970s and a public backlash against CIA that profoundly influenced subsequent interpretations of Angleton.


(Angleton had an opportunity here to explain the Soviet threat and he blew it. His performance at the Church Committee hearings and others contributed to the public backlash against the CIA and ultimately helped the Soviets discredit them.)


http://www.aarclibrary.org/publib/church/reports/vol2/html/ChurchV2_0040b.htm
	Senator Morgan. Mr. Angleton, the thing that shocks me is that these actions could be carried on contrary to the constitutional rights of the citizens of this country. Do you not believe that we can gather the necessary intelligence that we need for the protection and security of this country, and at the same time live within the Constitution? 

	Mr. Angleton. I am not a constitutional lawyer and I do not have at my fingertips those parts of the amendments which appear, on the surface, to give the President certain rights in wiretapping and electronic surveillance. 

	And if I understand it correctly, I do not believe there is too much of an extension to the next stage, which is the question of American and Soviet communications, or Soviet bloc communications.

	Senator Morgan. I would beg to differ on that, and on the analysis that you made, and also the one that Mr. Huston made. But for the purpose of the guidance of this committee, can you give us any suggestion as to how the actions of that Central Intelligence Agency can be monitored in such a way as to protect the fundamental rights of the American citizens of this country? 

	Mr. Angleton. You mean how it should be restructured? 

	Senator Morgan. Yes; earlier you suggested that maybe the Congress and the President should take some action. But the thing that bothers me, Mr. Angleton, is how can we act if we don’t know the facts? And, if we do act, the intelligence agencies refuse to obey the guidelines and ordinances. In other words you were doing all of these things before the Huston plan was ever devised. You continued to do them after the President rejected the report. So, what assurance do we have that an intelligence agency would follow any mandate of the Congress or the President? And how can we prepare some mandates that would be followed? That is what this committee is searching for. 

	Mr. Angleton. I have nothing to contribute to that, sir, beyond what I have said already.


Angleton knew everything--what could have been a high profile, public exposé of Soviet activities ended up being an awkward, standoffish fight between the CIA and America's elected representatives. Worse, as a representative of the CIA, he gave the impression that the agency disregarded the fundamental American values of government accountability and rule of law.

Angleton was right about the Soviets, but by then that didn't do him--or the country--any favors. If anything, being right made things worse:


http://www.nytimes.com/1978/06/25/archives/the-angleton-story-from-forced-retirement-james-jesus-angleton.html
	THE ANGLETON

	By SEYMOUR M. HERSH JUNE 25, 1978 

	Early in the morning on Dec. 22, 1974, the day The New York Times ran the first of my series of reports on domestic spying by the Central Intelligence Agency, I got a phone call from James Angleton, who was identified in my story as the C.I.A.'s director of counterintelligence.

	“Do you know what you've done?” he said. “You've blown my cover. My wife, in 31 years of marriage, was never aware of my activity until your story. And now she's left me.”

	Angleton's office, I had been told by my Government sources, had directed the agency's illegal domestic activities, which had included amassing files on as many as 10,000 Americans and opening private mail, in violation of the Congressional statute barring the C.I.A. from intelligence operations within the United States. Nevertheless, I was stunned by the despair in his voice and mumbled some apology about a newsman's responsibility to the truth.

	I quickly telephoned a friend who had worked with Angleton in the C.I.A. My friend laughed.

	“I can tell you,” he said, “that Cicely did leave him, but not because of you. She left him about three years ago to go live out in Arizona.”

	She had since returned. “Of course,” my friend added, “she knows all about the C.I.A.”

	I had come across Angleton while gathering material for the C.I.A. series. In fact, I had had a long phone conversation with him just a few days previously. While denying any involvement in domestic spying, he suddenly began blurting out what I thought was highly secret information about alleged links between foreign Communist governments and domestic opponents of the Vietnam War. He told me of an agent “still active and still productive” in Moscow who was providing information about antiwar bombings inside the United States. He spoke of tracing Black Panthers to North Korea, where, he said, they were trained in the use of explosives. When I checked these allegations with other informed Government officials, they scoffed. There was no evidence, they said, of anything like that.

	...Angleton's side of the story was not long in coming.

	...I began to wonder: Who was this master spycatcher with a lifelong interest in Ezra Pound and Dante and a penchant for startling statements during conversations with journalists on the phone? ...It seemed to me that trying to understand this intelligence agent extraordinary could be a key to something of larger importance — the widely credited myth, with its pervasive effect on Congress, that somehow the C.I.A. and the people who run it are more competent and more knowing than the rest of us.

	...Angleton once again has become relevant to the issue — grown almost into a national debate —of what the C.I.A.'s mission should and should not be. He is, in effect, waging covert war on the C.I.A.'s new counterintelligence leaders over the one aspect of the problem that for him is the issue — the C.I.A.'s ability to withstand Soviet penetration.

	...He has become a source for many current newspaper articles and books with considerable impact on public opinion.

	For example, there is the recent widely reviewed book “Legend,” by Edward Jay Epstein, with its suggestion that the public perception of Lee Harvey Oswald as a disturbed loner may be a K.G.B. cover story — that President Kennedy's assassin may have been recruited by the Soviets (though not with assassination in mind). The book is based partially on interviews with Angleton, and the Oswald theory goes back to an old case involving a Soviet defector named Yuri Nosenko.

	One of the first things Nosenko told the C.I.A. when he came over in 1964 was that Oswald had not been recruited by the K.G.B. during his years in the Soviet Union. Angleton was skeptical. The Russian was placed in virtual solitary confinement and intensively interrogated for much of the next three years by Angleton and other counterintelligence men. Finally cleared as a credible source, Nosenko was relocated in North Carolina and placed on the C.I.A. payroll as a consultant. Angleton, however, remained convinced that Nosenko was a K.G.B. “disinformation” plant — even though, immediately after his defection, Nosenko had provided the C.I.A. with information that led to the arrest of at least two Soviet agents and to the shutting‐down of a major K.G.B. ring in France

	...Angleton's fundamental message that the C.I.A. counterintelligence capability has been seriously weakened by his ouster — is an article of faith with his former aides. “Counterintelligence just isn't a trade you can learn in a day,” one of them said to me recently. “There's an awful lot of data you must know, an awful lot of reading you must do.” He said he and Angleton once estimated that it took a young C.I.A. recruit five years to become a sophisticated counterintelligence agent. “The K.G.B.'s got the agency on the ropes,” he added. “Whether they can bring in a Sunday punch at this point we don't know yet. The capability for C.I. [counterintelligence] and for the whole has been damaged.”

	Other present and past officials of the C.I.A. dismissed such notions when talked to them. These men, who are among Angleton's critics, insist that the C.I.A.'s intelligence is as good as ever and that its counterintelligence is now more rational. They concede that the agency has come under closer control by Congress and the White House, but they see this as an inevitable result of the agency's past excesses.

	“The real question,” said one former high‐level C.I.A. official, “is: Did any of the C.I.A. directors ever really know all of what Angleton's office was doing? My guess is no.”

	What his office was doing, Angleton told a Senate Intelligence Committee hearing on the mail‐intercept program, was — among other things — ferreting out “foreign involvement” in the United States. And judging from a statement he made at an earlier closeddoor meeting with Senate investigators, this responsibility, in his mind, went pretty far. “It is inconceivable,” he said to the investigators, “that a secret intelligence arm of the Government has to comply with all the overt orders of the Government.” When, at the public hearing, Senator Richard S. Schweiker, reading from the record, asked him if that was an accurate quotation, Angleton replied, “Well, if it is accurate, it should not have been said.”

	...As for the participation of his division in illegal C.I.A. activities within the United States, one former agency official delivered himself of a passionate defense:

	“Look, you can legislate against violations of the [C.I.A.] charter, you can set up committees to investigate us, but you can never understand a clandestine organization unless you're involved in it. No Congressman and no Senator can understand it. It's so intense, so compassionate. can people and the Congress have to trust us. You can't legislate morality and integrity. We had a job to do for the United States Government, and we did it. We all faced our moral crises, our personal Gethsemanes, and had to do some jobs by any means possible.

	...But what had he done? What were his substantive achievements?

	In one magazine article shortly after his resignation, a longtime friend of Angleton's wrote that “the number of spies who have been caught in Angleton's net runs into the dozens.” I checked that with other C.I.A. officials, and they were more restrained. They said that many of the spies “caught” by him and his staff had, in fact, been turned in by defectors, and that many of the defectors were cold‐war refugees whose information was, at best, self‐serving.

	...As for detente, he has voiced suspicions that that, too, may be part of a Soviet intelligence plot to weaken American defenses. A former longtime C.I.A. official who met with Angleton shortly before his ouster found him concerned that “too many members of the press had ties to Russia.” “Anybody who wrote anything friendly to the Soviet Union,” the official told me, “he considers suspect.”

	These apparently deeply held beliefs, which seemed to have been shared by many of his men in the counterintelligence unit, were a source of dismay and embarrassment to most of the present and past C.I.A. officials to whom I talked about Angleton. One former official, who served as an aide to Richard Helms when Helms was director, recalled that Angleton would occasionally give his views of the Sino‐Soviet split at staff meetings, “and everybody would just look at one another and shrug.... Our view of the counterintelligence staff ranged from comical to one of horror.” Angleton's forced resignation was welcomed by many of his colleagues as ridding the agency of a high-level element of irrationality.

	How is it, then, that a man of such peculiar views should have risen so high in the intelligence establishment?

	One answer that emerged from my interviews had to do with a kind of tolerance of overzealousness in a good cause. Many of the people to whom Angleton owed his rise were men with an instinctive fear and hatred of Communism, carried over from their postwar intelligence work in Europe, who believed that the Soviet Union was waiting for American willpower to be drained away before moving directly against us. 

	...“Jim starts from the premise that the Soviet Union is a threat,” the official said. “It seems to me that you fellows” — meaning journalists critical of the C.I.A. — “are missing the key point: What is that threat? The threat has changed, but you could make a case that it's even greater today.” Détente could be a subtle contributing factor. In fact, he said, that was his own view.

	...From all these interviews, eventually gained the impression that Angleton was not only a proponent of the cold war but one of its victims, The political struggles that, to one degree or another, were provoked by the Soviet Union after World War II left the West with a legacy of fear of Soviet expansionism. As in any political conflict, there were extremists on both sides, and, over the years, Angleton came to symbolize one end of the spectrum, his apprehension of the Communist threat affecting his view of all things Russian. Thus, Nosenko could not simply be a Soviet defector; he had to be a pawn in a brilliant K.G.B. attempt to undermine the political security and well‐being of the United States. And if Nosenko did turn in some Soviet agents, Angleton would argue that they were agents who already had been written off by the K.G.B. The circle never ends.

	...Colby made it his goal, first, to take the Israeli desk away from Angleton, and, second, to force him out of the agency. In his recent book, “Honorable Men,” Colby writes, “I looked in vain for some tangible results in the counterintelligence field, and found little or none. I did not suspect Angleton and his staff of engaging in improper activities. I just could not figure out what they were at all.”
	
	...The phone call in which he accused me of breaking up his marriage was, I can only deduce, meant to make me suffer for “blowing his cover,” revealing the domestic spying operations and being responsible, in some way, for his dismissal. In another phone conversation, a few days later, he accused both me and The Times of “helping out the K.G.B. a great deal. You've done them a great service.” That his cover had long been blown as far as the Soviets were concerned — for one thing, Philby had identified him by name and title in his 1968 book, “My Silent War” — was something he apparently chose to forget.

	When I later told him that I wanted to write something more comprehensive about his career — he had, in the meantime, received the Distinguished Intelligence Medal, the C.I.A.'s highest award — he refused to grant me a formal interview and said, “You just go ahead and do what you want to do. The damage is pretty much irrevocable.” The threat to national security posed by the domestic‐spying revelations and his dismissal was, he assured me, far more extensive than I could possibly realize.


For whatever reason, Angleton saw it fit to call Hersh and "blurt out highly secret information," as Hersh put it. Hersh tied the warnings of Soviet subversion to Angleton, and the character assassination of Angleton took Angleton's message down with him.

Between Hersh, Colby, Watergate, "the family Jewels," the Pike Committee, the Church Committee, and Angleton, the "character assassination" campaign extended to the whole of the intelligence community. The public needed to know a secret, but the only ones who could tell it had been silenced.

The whole affair is said to have crippled the U.S. ability to understand and respond to active measures for years, and the public was largely kept in the dark. Some members of the U.S. intelligence community disagreed with Colby's reforms, however, and eventually formed the inter-agency Active Measures Working group, which made public the report (among others) 'Soviet Active Measures in the "Post-Cold War" Era' mentioned above:


http://ndupress.ndu.edu/Portals/68/Documents/stratperspective/inss/Strategic-Perspectives-11.pdf
	...In the words of one intelligence traditionalist, the CIA’s counterintelligence staff basically “lobotomized itself.” Some traditionalists retired or were forced out, but many of those who remained were determined to limit, counter, and reverse the impact of the reforms. Such individuals played a critical role in establishing the Active Measures Working Group.

	...Over the same period that dominant U.S. strategic thinking, intelligence reform, and organizational priorities and structure were disposing the U.S. national security bureaucracy to ignore Soviet disinformation, the Soviets were reemphasizing the importance of deception and disinformation and redoubling their efforts in these areas.

	In May 1959, the Soviet leadership had transformed the KGB from a domestic repressive apparatus into a more sophisticated tool for influencing foreign affairs, one that included a KGB active measures department called Department D. According to CIA testimony in 1961, the KGB produced at least 32 forgeries of official U.S. documents in the previous 4 years (some went undetected) covering diverse topics but all portraying the United States as a major threat to world peace with imperial designs on the Third World. In 1971, the Soviets again upgraded Department D, making it a “Service” (Service A) and placed it under the direction of a KGB general. In this organizational structure, the Soviets built up a formidable disinformation bureaucracy of some 700 officers and integrated it with their larger active measures and strategic intelligence operations, which involved thousands of other personnel.

	...Integrating these diverse activity sets allowed the Soviets to react quickly to historical developments. For example, after President John F. Kennedy’s assassination in November 1963, the KGB paid an American communist and Soviet agent in New York City to publish and distribute a book that used KBG forgeries to support the claim that Kennedy was killed by a right-wing racist conspiracy with help from the FBI and CIA. The book came out less than 10 months later and just before the Warren Commission released its findings that Lee Harvey Oswald acted alone. By contrast, U.S. efforts to counter Soviet disinformation were anything but centralized, integrated, and timely—indeed 15 years later, attempts to counter Soviet disinformation had virtually disappeared.

	...Despite détente and the intelligence reforms of the mid-1970s, some people remained convinced of the need to counter Soviet disinformation and deception. This view was not popular in the intelligence bureaucracy and even less so in academia, but in Congress it found fertile ground in a number of offices. Several congressional staff and investigators on the Senate Intelligence Committee and House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence, notably Herbert Romerstein, Angelo Codevilla, and Kenneth deGraffenried, were interested in studying and exposing Soviet deception and active measures. These staffers used their positions to push the intelligence agencies to start reporting again on active measures—something the CIA had not done since 1965—particularly during the final 2 years of the Carter administration when support for détente was wearing thin in the face of aggressive Soviet behavior.

	...They even went so far as to target President Carter himself with disinformation in September 1980. The KGB produced a forged NSC document that was then run in an American communist newspaper under the title “Carter’s Secret Plan to Keep Black Africans and Black Americans at Odds.” The case is illustrative of both Soviet tactics and the lack of American readiness to respond. TASS (Telegrafnoye agentstvo Sovetskovo Soyuza) picked up and distributed the article, and the KGB disseminated the TASS piece around the world through Soviet embassies. In under a month, the KGB had produced a forgery, published it through an American agent, disseminated the disinformation via TASS stringers who wrote an article citing the American article for legitimacy, and then redistributed it to their agents of influence around the world. In contrast, the few U.S. experts on Soviet disinformation within the national security bureaucracy had no high-level access or organizational vehicle for coordinating a response. Therefore, the White House had to answer the charges directly if it felt the need, which it did. It held a press conference on September 17 to protest the forgery. It was a partial success. The Washington Post reported the White House’s exposure of the forgery on page two. However, the White House spokesman, feeling the need to be cautious, refused to identify the source of the forgery. As a result, the Post ’s reporter was left to speculate about the forgery’s origins, raising the question of whether Carter’s political foes—specifically Ronald Reagan—were responsible. As the saying goes, “the lie was halfway around the world while the truth was still getting its boots on.”

	Such shenanigans did nothing to improve U.S.-Soviet relations, which were already on a downward trajectory for multiple reasons, but particularly because of the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan. In the United States, “most experts would probably have agreed that [the global balance of power] had been titling in Moscow’s favor through most of the 1970s”; the invasion of Afghanistan seemed to put the exclamation mark on this realignment. With U.S. leaders trying to limit damage from the Vietnam debacle, stem strategic disengagement by Congress, and overcome the agonizing self-doubt inflicted by Watergate and other scandals, some believed that the United States was on the strategic defensive and in danger of irreversible decline. One scholar who would later play a key role in establishing the Active Measures Working Group worried that the Soviets were on the verge of “psychologically anesthetizing Americans” against the implications of expanding Soviet power.

	...Reagan’s fundamental “reset” in U.S.-Soviet relations, resolutely pursued by top intelligence and public diplomacy officials, was the precondition for the creation of the Active Measures Working Group. The administration had put the bureaucracy on notice that the underlying assumption of détente—that the Soviet Union was too powerful and permanent to confront— was dead. Confronting the Soviet Union was very much in vogue, and the Active Measures Working Group was one of many initiatives reflecting this shift in policy.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Active_Measures_Working_Group
	The Interagency Active Measures Working Group was a group led by the United States Department of State and later by the United States Information Agency (USIA). The group was formed early during the Reagan administration, in 1981, when some mid-level officials in the U.S. Department of State sought a more robust effort to counter aggressive Soviet propaganda. Some believe also that the group was created because active measures experts in the CIA wanted an outlet for their findings that could be more overt and credible than those of the CIA.

	...The group's first counter-disinformation effort against the Soviet Union took the form of a report, "State Department Special Report 88, Soviet Active Measures: Forgery, Disinformation, Political Operations" in October 1981. The document was a four-page overview of soviet active measures techniques and included Soviet disinformation themes and past examples. 14,000 copies of the report were distributed to news organizations, federal agencies, etc.

	The group also issued a series of State Department Foreign Affairs Notes that USIA distributed to journalists, academics, and other interested persons abroad. One important publication distributed by the group was the House Intelligence Committee hearing on Soviet Active Measures which showed foreign audiences that there was congressional support for exposing Soviet disinformation.

	The group also held press conferences to expose Soviet forgeries and distributed copies of the fake documents to attending journalists.

	This method was further encouraged when Congress passed a law in 1985 requiring that the Interagency Active Measures Working Group publish a series of reports on Soviet active measures. Accordingly, the State Department published three reports in 1986, 1987 and 1989. The FBI also contributed by providing reports that were printed in these publications on Soviet active measures in the United States.

	...Abolition

	Support for the group began to deteriorate in the late 1980s because Soviet disinformation seemed less of a threat in light of Gorbachev's Glasnost, and the Soviets' promise to cease all disinformation operations...


The rest, as they say, is history.


https://pastebin.com/1vwGxnsr
